California, session 20252026, SB576.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 27.3 (commencing with Section 22775) is added to Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code, to read: CHAPTER 27.3. Video Streaming Services22775. For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:(a) “Video programming” has the same meaning as defined in Section 613(h) of Title 47 of the United States Code.(b) (1) “Video streaming service” means an entity that makes available directly to the consumer, through a distribution method that uses internet protocol, either of the following:(A) Video programming.(B) Video content the entity makes available for users to view.(2) “Video streaming service” does not include a television broadcast station, cable operator, or other multichannel video programing distributor, or an entity that serves video programming or video content without commercial advertisements.22776. On and after July 1, 2026, a video streaming service that serves consumers residing in the state shall not transmit the audio of commercial advertisements louder than the video content the advertisements accompany, consistent with the regulations adopted by the Federal Communications Commission pursuant to the Commercial Advertisement Loudness Mitigation (CALM) Act (Public Law 111-311) for television broadcast stations, cable operators, and other multichannel video programming distributors.22777. This chapter does not create a private right of action.